lexicon_project.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+St2ps	 ! Standard 2nd person singular
	+Cv2ps	 ! Chilean voseo form for 2 person singular
	+Inf	 ! Infinitive
	+Pre	 ! Present tense
	+Pret	 ! Preterite
	+Imp	 ! Imperfect
	+Cond	 ! Conditional
	+Fut	 ! Future
	+SubjPre ! Subjunctive present
	+SubjImp ! Subjunctive imprerfect
	+SubjFut ! Subjunctive future
	+PerPre	 ! Present Perfect
	+PerPret ! Preterite Perfect
	+PerPast ! Past Perfect
	+PerCond ! Conditional Perfect
	+PerFut  ! Future Perfect
	+PerSubjPre	! Subjunctive Present Perfect
	+PerSubjPast	! Subjunctive Past Perfect
	+PerSubjFut	! Subjunctive Future Perfect
	+ConPre		! Continuous Present
	+ConPret	! Continuous Preterite
	+ConImp		! Continuous Imprefect
	+ConCond	! Continuous Conditional
	+Impera		! Imperative
	+ImperaNeg	! Negative Imperative

LEXICON Root
0:	VerbStems ;

LEXICON VerbStems
hablar:_habl	ArVerb ;	! hablar = to speak
amar:_am		ArVerb ;	! amar	= to love
llamar:_llam	ArVerb ;	! llamar = to call / to be called
fumar:_fum	ArVerb ;	! fumar = to smoke
acabar:_acab	ArVerb ;	! acabar = to finish
bailar:_bail	ArVerb ;	! bailar = to dance
contar:_cOnt	ArVerb ;	! contar = to tell/to count
comer:_com	ErVerb ;	! comer = to eat
querer:_quEr	ErVerb ;	! querer = to want / to love
entender:_entEnd	ErVerb ;	! entender = to understand
perder:_pErd	ErVerb ;	! perder = to lose, to get lost
correr:_corr	ErVerb ;	! correr = to run
vivir:_viv	IrVerb ;	! vivir = to live
abrir:_abr	IrVerb ;	! abrir = to open
morir:_mOr	IrVerb ;	! morir = to die
dormir:_dOrm~	IrVerb ;	! dormir = to sleep
ser:_		SerVerb ;	! ser = to be

LEXICON ArVerb
+Inf:ar	# ;
+Pre:^	A_endings ;
+Pret+St2ps:aste	# ;
+Pret+Cv2ps:aste        # ;
+Imp:ab	A_endings ;
+Cond:arí	A_endings ;
+Fut:ar	Fut_A_endings ;
+SubjPre:^	Ei_endings ;
+SubjImp:ar	A_endings ;
+SubjFut+St2ps:ares	# ;
+SubjFut+Cv2ps:ares     # ;
+PerPre:ado1	Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPret:ado2	Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPast:ado3    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerCond:ado4   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerFut:ado5    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPre:ado6   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPast:ado7    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjFut:ado8   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPre:ando9      Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPret:ando13	Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConImp:ando11	Auxiliar_verbs ; 
+ConCond:ando12	Auxiliar_verbs ;
+Impera+St2ps:^^a	# ;
+Impera+Cv2ps:^^a	# ;
+ImperaNeg:N^	Ei_endings ;

LEXICON A_endings
+St2ps:^as	# ;
+Cv2ps:~ái	# ;

LEXICON Fut_A_endings
+St2ps:ás      # ;
+Cv2ps:ái      # ;

LEXICON Auxiliar_verbs
+St2ps:ST      # ;
+Cv2ps:CV      # ;

LEXICON ErVerb
+Inf:er	# ;
+Pre:^	Ei_endings ;
+Pret+St2ps:iste	# ;
+Pret+Cv2ps:iste        # ;
+Imp:í	A_endings ;	
+Cond:erí	A_endings ;	
+Fut:er	Fut_A_endings ;	
+SubjPre:^    A_endings ;
+SubjImp:ier  A_endings ;
+SubjFut+St2ps:ieres # ;
+SubjFut+Cv2ps:ieres # ;
+PerPre:ido1    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPret:ido2   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPast:ido3    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerCond:ido4   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerFut:ido5    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPre:ido6   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPast:ido7    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjFut:ido8   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPre:iendo9      Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPret:iendo13 Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConImp:iendo11  Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConCond:iendo12 Auxiliar_verbs ;
+Impera+St2ps:^^e       # ;
+Impera+Cv2ps:^^e       # ;
+ImperaNeg:N^   A_endings ;

LEXICON Ei_endings
+St2ps:^es       # ;                                    
+Cv2ps:í       # ; 

LEXICON IrVerb
+Inf:ir	# ;
+Pre:^	Ei_endings ;
+Pret+St2ps:iste	# ;
+Pret+Cv2ps:iste        # ;
+Imp:í        A_endings ;  
+Cond:irí     A_endings ;   
+Fut:ir      Fut_A_endings ;	
+SubjPre:^~	A_endings ;		
+SubjImp:ier~~	A_endings ;
+SubjFut+St2ps:ieres~~	# ;
+SubjFut+Cv2ps:ieres~~    # ;
+PerPre:ido1    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPret:ido2   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPast:ido3    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerCond:ido4   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerFut:ido5    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPre:ido6   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPast:ido7    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjFut:ido8   Auxiliar_verbs ;	
+ConPre:~~iendo9      Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPret:~~iendo13	Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConImp:~~iendo11  Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConCond:~~iendo12 Auxiliar_verbs ;
+Impera+St2ps:^^e       # ;
+Impera+Cv2ps:^^e       # ;
+ImperaNeg:N^~   A_endings ;

LEXICON SerVerb
+Inf:ser # ;
+Pre:er  Ei_endings ;
+Pret+St2ps:fuiste        # ;
+Pret+Cv2ps:fuiste        # ;
+Imp:er        A_endings ;
+Cond:serí     A_endings ;
+Fut:ser      Fut_A_endings ;
+SubjPre:se      A_endings ;
+SubjImp:fuer   A_endings ;
+SubjFut+St2ps:fueres    # ;
+SubjFut+Cv2ps:fueres    # ;
+PerPre:sido1    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPret:sido2   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerPast:sido3    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerCond:sido4   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerFut:sido5    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPre:sido6   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjPast:sido7    Auxiliar_verbs ;
+PerSubjFut:sido8   Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPre:siendo9      Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConPret:siendo13 Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConImp:siendo11  Auxiliar_verbs ;
+ConCond:siendo12 Auxiliar_verbs ;
+Impera+St2ps:sé       # ;
+Impera+Cv2ps:sé       # ;
+ImperaNeg:Nse   A_endings ;

END
